lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX Q Y 943
SFX Q 0       is              as
SFX Q as      ojo             as
SFX Q s       jam             as
SFX Q as      àjá             as
SFX Q as      uoju            as
SFX Q s       jame            as
SFX Q as      ieji            [^i]as
SFX Q as      eji             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tieji           èias
SFX Q as      eji             [^d]þias
SFX Q as      øjø             as
SFX Q as      iesiems         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esiems          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tiesiems        èias
SFX Q as      esiems          [^d]þias
SFX Q as      uosius          as
SFX Q s       isiais          as
SFX Q as      uosiuose        as
SFX Q as      oji             as
SFX Q as      osios           as
SFX Q s       jai             as
SFX Q as      àjà             as
SFX Q as      àja             as
SFX Q as      ojoje           as
SFX Q as      ojoj            as
SFX Q as      osioms          as
SFX Q as      àsias           as
SFX Q as      osiomis         as
SFX Q as      osiose          as
SFX Q 0       is              us
SFX Q us      øjá             us
SFX Q us      iojo            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iajam           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iuoju           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iajame          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiojo           dus
SFX Q us      þiajam          dus
SFX Q us      þiuoju          dus
SFX Q us      þiajame         dus
SFX Q us      ojo             jus
SFX Q us      ajam            jus
SFX Q s       oju             jus
SFX Q us      ajame           jus
SFX Q tus     èiojo           tus
SFX Q tus     èiajam          tus
SFX Q tus     èiuoju          tus
SFX Q tus     èiajame         tus
SFX Q us      ieji            us
SFX Q us      iesiems         us
SFX Q us      iøjø            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iuosius         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iaisiais        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iuosiuose       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiøjø           dus
SFX Q us      þiuosius        dus
SFX Q us      þiaisiais       dus
SFX Q us      þiuosiuose      dus
SFX Q us      øjø             jus
SFX Q s       osius           jus
SFX Q us      aisiais         jus
SFX Q s       osiuose         jus
SFX Q tus     èiøjø           tus
SFX Q tus     èiuosius        tus
SFX Q tus     èiaisiais       tus
SFX Q tus     èiuosiuose      tus
SFX Q us      ioji            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iosios          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iajai           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iàjà            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iàja            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iojoje          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iojoj           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þioji           dus
SFX Q us      þiosios         dus
SFX Q us      þiajai          dus
SFX Q us      þiàjà           dus
SFX Q us      þiàja           dus
SFX Q us      þiojoje         dus
SFX Q us      þiojoj          dus
SFX Q us      oji             jus
SFX Q us      osios           jus
SFX Q us      ajai            jus
SFX Q us      àjà             jus
SFX Q us      àja             jus
SFX Q us      ojoje           jus
SFX Q us      ojoj            jus
SFX Q tus     èioji           tus
SFX Q tus     èiosios         tus
SFX Q tus     èiajai          tus
SFX Q tus     èiàjà           tus
SFX Q tus     èiàja           tus
SFX Q tus     èiojoje         tus
SFX Q tus     èiojoj          tus
SFX Q us      iosioms         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iàsias          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iosiomis        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iosiose         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiosioms        dus
SFX Q us      þiàsias         dus
SFX Q us      þiosiomis       dus
SFX Q us      þiosiose        dus
SFX Q us      osioms          jus
SFX Q us      àsias           jus
SFX Q us      osiomis         jus
SFX Q us      osiose          jus
SFX Q tus     èiosioms        tus
SFX Q tus     èiàsias         tus
SFX Q tus     èiosiomis       tus
SFX Q tus     èiosiose        tus
SFX Q as      esnis           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnio           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniam          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esná            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniu           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniame         [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnis           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnio           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniam          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esná            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniu           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniame         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesnis          èias
SFX Q èias    tesnio          èias
SFX Q èias    tesniam         èias
SFX Q èias    tesná           èias
SFX Q èias    tesniu          èias
SFX Q èias    tesniame        èias
SFX Q us      esnis           us
SFX Q us      esnio           us
SFX Q us      esniam          us
SFX Q us      esná            us
SFX Q us      esniu           us
SFX Q us      esniame         us
SFX Q as      esnë            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnës           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnei           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnæ            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esne            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnëje          [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnë            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnës           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnei           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnæ            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esne            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnëje          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesnë           èias
SFX Q èias    tesnës          èias
SFX Q èias    tesnei          èias
SFX Q èias    tesnæ           èias
SFX Q èias    tesne           èias
SFX Q èias    tesnëje         èias
SFX Q us      esnë            us
SFX Q us      esnës           us
SFX Q us      esnei           us
SFX Q us      esnæ            us
SFX Q us      esne            us
SFX Q us      esnëje          us
SFX Q as      esni            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniø           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniems         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnius          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniais         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuose        [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esni            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniø           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniems         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnius          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniais         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuose        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesni           èias
SFX Q èias    tesniø          èias
SFX Q èias    tesniems        èias
SFX Q èias    tesnius         èias
SFX Q èias    tesniais        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniuose       èias
SFX Q us      esni            us
SFX Q us      esniø           us
SFX Q us      esniems         us
SFX Q us      esnius          us
SFX Q us      esniais         us
SFX Q us      esniuose        us
SFX Q as      esnëms          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnes           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnëmis         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnëse          [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnëms          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnes           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnëmis         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnëse          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesnëms         èias
SFX Q èias    tesnes          èias
SFX Q èias    tesnëmis        èias
SFX Q èias    tesnëse         èias
SFX Q us      esnëms          us
SFX Q us      esnes           us
SFX Q us      esnëmis         us
SFX Q us      esnëse          us
SFX Q as      esnysis         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniojo         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniajam        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnájá          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuoju        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniajame       [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnysis         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniojo         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniajam        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esnájá          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuoju        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniajame       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesnysis        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniojo        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniajam       èias
SFX Q èias    tesnájá         èias
SFX Q èias    tesniuoju       èias
SFX Q èias    tesniajame      èias
SFX Q us      esnysis         us
SFX Q us      esniojo         us
SFX Q us      esniajam        us
SFX Q us      esnájá          us
SFX Q us      esniuoju        us
SFX Q us      esniajame       us
SFX Q as      esnioji         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniosios       [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniajai        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniàjà         [^i]as
