lib/dict/lt.dic
abejotinas/BNQ
abuojas/BNQ
aguonuotas/BNQ
aikğtus/BNQ
aistrus/BNQ
akiniuotas/BNQ
aklinas/BNQ
akrobatiğkas/BNQ
akustiğkas/BNQ
aliejingas/BNQ
alkus/BNQ
şalsvas/BNQ
amaruotas/BNQ
amşinas/BNQ
anemiğkas/BNQ
ankğèiuotas/BNQ
anomalus/BNQ
antisemitiğkas/BNQ
apëdrus/BNQ
apşiûrus/BNQ
aplamas/BNQ
apsukas/BNQ
apverktinas/BNQ
arkliğkas/BNQ
artistiğkas/BNQ
asocialus/BNQ
atbulas/BNQ
atgrasus/BNQ
atkilus/BNQ
atlinkas/BNQ
atsainus/BNQ
atskiras/BNQ
atvalgus/BNQ
audrus/BNQ
aukğtielninkas/BNQ
austriğkas/BNQ
áavus/BNQ
baisingas/BNQ
balsvas/BNQ
banguotas/BNQ
basnirèias/BNQ
bûdingas/BNQ
belgiğkas/BNQ
besaikiğkas/BNQ
bevaliğkas/BNQ
bjaurus/BNQ
blausus/BNQ
bohemiğkas/BNQ
bëras/BNQ
brutalus/BNQ
buklus/BNQ
chemiğkas/BNQ
cukrinas/BNQ
daiktavardiğkas/BNQ
dalingas/BNQ
dantingas/BNQ
darganas/BNQ
daubotas/BNQ
debesingas/BNQ
değimteriopas/BNQ
demonstratyvus/BNQ
despotiğkas/BNQ
didşiadvasiğkas/BNQ
diletantiğkas/BNQ
dirglus/BNQ
dşiugus/BNQ
dëmesingas/BNQ
domus/BNQ
drabnus/BNQ
drastiğkas/BNQ
drevëtas/BNQ
dryşuotas/BNQ
drugiğkas/BNQ
druskinas/BNQ
dubus/BNQ
dulsvas/BNQ
duoninas/BNQ
duslus/BNQ
dvazgus/BNQ
dvisus/BNQ
ğeğeriopas/BNQ
egoistiğkas/BNQ
eiliuotas/BNQ
ekonomiğkas/BNQ
ekstremalus/BNQ
elementarus/BNQ
emaliuotas/BNQ
şemëtas/BNQ
epiğkas/BNQ
ğeriğkas/BNQ
ğerpetotas/BNQ
europietiğkas/BNQ
fataliğkas/BNQ
fiziologiğkas/BNQ
funkcionalus/BNQ
gaisruotas/BNQ
gajus/BNQ
galvingas/BNQ
garbingas/BNQ
garsus/BNQ
gûburiuotas/BNQ
geidulingas/BNQ
gelumbëtas/BNQ
geranoriğkas/BNQ
ágilus/BNQ
gintaringas/BNQ
gyvas/BNQ
glamşus/BNQ
gleşnas/BNQ
gëlëtas/BNQ
gobğus/BNQ
graibğtus/BNQ
grasus/BNQ
grûduotas/BNQ
grieştas/BNQ
grizlus/BNQ
gráştamas/BNQ
gûsiuotas/BNQ
gurguluotas/BNQ
hermetiğkas/BNQ
iğşargas/BNQ
ğiaurus/BNQ
iğdaigus/BNQ
iğdubas/BNQ
şievëtas/BNQ
iğkalbingas/BNQ
iğkrikas/BNQ
ilgesingas/BNQ
şilsvas/BNQ
iğmoningas/BNQ
indoeuropietiğkas/BNQ
iniciatyvus/BNQ
intelektualus/BNQ
şioplas/BNQ
iğrankus/BNQ
ironiğkas/BNQ
islamiğkas/BNQ
iğteklingas/BNQ
ğiukğlingas/BNQ
iğvaizdingas/BNQ
şymëtas/BNQ
jaukus/BNQ
junglus/BNQ
kailiniuotas/BNQ
kalkiuotas/BNQ
kampuotas/BNQ
kapitaliğkas/BNQ
karğus/BNQ
kûdas/BNQ
keltas/BNQ
keturkampiğkas/BNQ
ûkiğkas/BNQ
kirmëlëtas/BNQ
klausus/BNQ
klûpsèias/BNQ
knygiğkas/BNQ
kompleksiğkas/BNQ
korektiğkas/BNQ
krapğtus/BNQ
kriauğiuotas/BNQ
krûtiningas/BNQ
kuokğtuotas/BNQ
kvapus/BNQ
laipsniuotas/BNQ
languotas/BNQ
leidşiamas/BNQ
liaunas/BNQ
liguistas/BNQ
ğliurëtas/BNQ
lobingas/BNQ
luomiğkas/BNQ
maiğtingas/BNQ
mankğtus/BNQ
masiğkas/BNQ
mediciniğkas/BNQ
meniğkas/BNQ
mielas/BNQ
miltuotas/BNQ
mëğlinas/BNQ
moksliğkas/BNQ
motiniğkas/BNQ
murzinas/BNQ
nariuotas/BNQ
neatskiriamas/BNQ
nematytas/BNQ
nesulaikomas/BNQ
nigerietiğkas/BNQ
normalus/BNQ
nuodugnus/BNQ
nuosakus/BNQ
objektyvus/BNQ
operatyvus/BNQ
pağaipus/BNQ
pagelus/BNQ
paiğus/BNQ
pakuliğkas/BNQ
panagus/BNQ
parazitiğkas/BNQ
pasiekiamas/BNQ
pastaras/BNQ
patriarchaliğkas/BNQ
pavydus/BNQ
penkeriopas/BNQ
perğus/BNQ
piktavaliğkas/BNQ
piratiğkas/BNQ
plauğingas/BNQ
plokğèias/BNQ
populiarus/BNQ
pragmatiğkas/BNQ
pranarus/BNQ
pravartus/BNQ
prieğingas/BNQ
prigimtas/BNQ
priverèiamas/BNQ
provincialus/BNQ
puolus/BNQ
putrotas/BNQ
rainuotas/BNQ
rağtingas/BNQ
reakcingas/BNQ
religiğkas/BNQ
rûgğtingas/BNQ
riteriğkas/BNQ
rëksmingas/BNQ
rugëtas/BNQ
saikus/BNQ
sangviniğkas/BNQ
sausakimğas/BNQ
savistovus/BNQ
senamadiğkas/BNQ
siauras/BNQ
silpnaprotiğkas/BNQ
siutingas/BNQ
skardus/BNQ
skirtingas/BNQ
skraistëtas/BNQ
skubus/BNQ
slûgus/BNQ
smalsus/BNQ
sàmojingas/BNQ
sniegingas/BNQ
spalvotas/BNQ
spygliuotas/BNQ
sraigiğkas/BNQ
ástabus/BNQ
statmenas/BNQ
storşieviğkas/BNQ
sugestyvus/BNQ
superlaidus/BNQ
sveikas/BNQ
taikingas/BNQ
tamsuoliğkas/BNQ
tarptautiğkas/BNQ
teigiamas/BNQ
teoretiğkas/BNQ
tikras/BNQ
titaniğkas/BNQ
tolydus/BNQ
trasus/BNQ
triûslus/BNQ
táslus/BNQ
tvarkus/BNQ
ugningas/BNQ
unksmingas/BNQ
upingas/BNQ
şuvingas/BNQ
şvainas/BNQ
vaizdingas/BNQ
valgus/BNQ
vamzdëtas/BNQ
variğkas/BNQ
vasariğkas/BNQ
veiksmaşodiğkas/BNQ
veltas/BNQ
verksnus/BNQ
veğus/BNQ
viengubas/BNQ
viesulingas/BNQ
vilnotas/BNQ
virğininkiğkas/BNQ
vitaminingas/BNQ
şvyringas/BNQ
votëtas/BNQ
